Hawaii statutes.
§28-10.6 Crime research, prevention, and
education; administrator and staff. (a) The department of the attorney
general shall initiate, develop, and perform or coordinate programs, projects,
and activities, as determined by the attorney general, on the subject of crime,
including but not limited to crime research, prevention, and education. The
attorney general may:

(1) Research, evaluate, and make recommendations
regarding crime, crime prevention, and the criminal justice system to the
governor, the legislature, the judiciary, criminal justice agencies, or the
general public, as appropriate;

(2) Develop and implement or coordinate statewide
crime prevention programs and activities including:

(A) Providing crime prevention training
programs for law enforcement agencies, citizens, businesses, and civic groups;
and

(B) Assisting in the organization of crime
prevention teams in communities to encourage the development of community crime
prevention programs;

(3) Develop public education programs through various
broadcast or print media to provide to the general public information that will
assist citizens in developing the knowledge and confidence to prevent crime and
to avoid becoming victims of crime;

(4) Establish, as deemed by the attorney general to
be necessary or appropriate, citizen and government agency representative study
teams to study specific crime subjects or criminal justice system problems, in
order to obtain input or advice from a more specialized segment of the criminal
justice or public community on those specific matters; and

(5) Establish trust funds or accounts and receive and
expend financial grants and donations for crime research, prevention, or
education.

(b) The attorney general may employ, without
regard to chapter 76, and at the attorney general's pleasure dismiss, an
administrator to oversee and carry out the programs, projects, and activities
on the subject of crime, as set forth in subsection (a). The attorney general
may also employ other support staff, in accordance with chapter 76, necessary
for the performance or coordination of the programs, projects, and activities
on the subject of crime. [L 1989, c 332, pt of §1; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L
2006, c 300, §5]

Case Notes

This section does not authorize the prosecuting attorney to
use public funds and resources to advocate for a proposed constitutional
amendment in a general election. 113 H. 446, 153 P.3d 1131.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next